Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 3. Replevin

Editor's notes. —

Most of the following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

In general. —

Whereas in replevin at common law, judgment could only be for return of the property, by statute an undertaking is given as substitute for the property, and is to be charged with the judgment. Union Pac. R.R. v. United States, 2 Wyo. 170,

1879 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1879), writ of error dismissed, 105 U.S. 263, 26 L. Ed. 1021, 1881 U.S. LEXIS 2118 (U.S. 1882).

Replevin has not been displaced by Uniform Commercial Code.

Brown v. Green, 618 P.2d 140,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1980).

Jurisdiction in replevin action. —

There is no basis for contention that court obtains jurisdiction in replevin action only when replevin writ or order for delivery has been issued. Deschenes v. Beall, 61 Wyo. 39, 154 P.2d 524,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1945).

Writ, defect in. —

Lack of signature on writ of replevin does not make it void, but it may be amended and defect may be waived by appearance in case without first making an objection. Deschenes v. Beall, 61 Wyo. 39, 154 P.2d 524,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1945).

Proof of defendant's title. —

Where court refused to permit defendant to prove his title to the property under the pleadings, but allowed him to amend the answer in order that court might admit such evidence, court did not err. Gregory v. Morris, 1 Wyo. 213,

1875 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1875), aff'd, 96 U.S. 619, 24 L. Ed. 740, 1877 U.S. LEXIS 1706 (U.S. 1878).

Judgment for damages. —

In an action of replevin, it was proper for court to render a judgment for damages without giving the defendant the alternative right to return of property. Montana & W. Oil Co. v. Gibson, 19 Wyo. 1, 113 P. 784,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1911).

Alternative judgments. —

Judgment in replevin suit in alternative for return of property to plaintiff's possession or for money judgment for value of property was improper as to part of the judgment allowing money recovery, in lieu of property; proper judgment being for recovery of the goods with damages under this section. Finance Corp. of Wyoming v. Commercial Credit Co., 41 Wyo. 198, 283 P. 1100,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1930).

Proof of damages. —

It was error to allow plaintiff damages in addition to recovery of property, under this section, where there was no proof submitted of damages. Finance Corp. of Wyoming v. Commercial Credit Co., 41 Wyo. 198, 283 P. 1100,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1930).

Measure of damages. —

The right of a defendant to damages, and the measure and extent of the right, depends on the particular statute authorizing such recovery, and the difference in language between this section and preceding section cannot be held to exclude a defendant from recovery of damages for illegal detention. Hunt v. Thompson, 19 Wyo. 523, 120 P. 181,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1912).

Compensatory damages. —

The principle upon which compensatory damages are assessed is that compensation for injury shall be commensurate with loss, so that under this section, which provides that a defendant in replevin upon a finding in his favor may have such an assessment of damages as is “right and proper,” a successful defendant is authorized to recover damages for wrongful detention where he would not otherwise be fully compensated. Hunt v. Thompson, 19 Wyo. 523, 120 P. 181,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1912).

Actual damages. —

In action for amount due on note secured by mortgage on personal property, for unlawful detention of property, and foreclosure of mortgage, tried on theory that action was in replevin, defendant was entitled to recover actual damages for taking of the property, under this section, if there was no default that gave plaintiff right to possession of the property. Jones v. Parker, 39 Wyo. 423, 273 P. 687,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1929).

Attorneys' fees not generally allowed in replevin. —

Generally, there can be no recovery of attorneys' fees as damages by the prevailing party in replevin, but where there is fraud, malice, oppression or wilful wrong in the bringing of the action there is an exception to the general rule, and attorneys' fees will be allowed. Olds v. Hosford, 354 P.2d 947,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 1960), reh'g denied, 359 P.2d 406,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1961).

But when allowance is proper overall amount should be determined
and thereafter apportioned. —

Where the circumstances of the case make the award of attorneys' fees proper, an overall, reasonable attorneys' fee should be first determined, followed by such apportionment of that fee among the several defending interests as is found to be just and equitable under all circumstances. Olds v. Hosford, 354 P.2d 947,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 1960), reh'g denied, 359 P.2d 406,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1961).

And judgment may not be entered for amount larger than that
prayed for. —

In no event may a judgment be entered for attorneys' fees in an amount larger than the sums prayed for by the respective defendants. Olds v. Hosford, 354 P.2d 947,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 1960), reh'g denied, 359 P.2d 406,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1961).

Instructions. —

Where court charged, when property claimed is not taken or is returned to defendant by sheriff for want of undertaking, action may proceed as one for damages only and plaintiff shall be entitled to such damages as are right and proper, court may give other, not inconsistent, instructions limiting and fixing amount. Hein v. Marcante, 57 Wyo. 81, 113 P.2d 940,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1941).

Though district court erred in refusing to give instruction requested by defendant to the jury, where in replevin action jury found for defendant, the latter cannot be injured by the refusal, and supreme court will not interfere with the judgment. Alsop v. Hutton, 1 Wyo. 284,

1876 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1876).

Defective verdict. —

Verdict in replevin action was not defective because it failed to find that defendant had right of property or possession. Jones v. Parker, 39 Wyo. 423, 273 P. 687,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1929).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

66 Am. Jur. 2d Replevin § 1 et seq.

77 C.J.S. Replevin § 1 et seq.

§ 1-15-301.
Possession of personal property pending action.

Subject to W.S.

1-15-101

through

1-15-108

, after filing the complaint and at any time before judgment,
the plaintiff in an action to recover the possession of personal property
may claim the delivery of the property to him as provided in this
article.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 672, 680; R.S. 1887, § 3020; R.S. 1899, § 4145; C.S. 1910, § 5005; C.S. 1920, § 6275; R.S. 1931, § 89-4001; C.S. 1945, § 3-7401; W.S. 1957, § 1-1000; Laws 1973, ch. 214, § 2; 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-34-101

; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Cited

in

Coones v. FDIC, 848 P.2d 783,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1993); Sheridan Com. Park v. Briggs, 848 P.2d 811,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1993).

§ 1-15-302.
Affidavit.

When delivery is claimed, the plaintiff shall file with the court an affidavit stating:

A description of the property claimed;

The plaintiff is the owner of the property or has a special ownership or interest in it, stating the facts in relation to it, and that he is entitled to the possession of it;

The property is wrongfully detained by the adverse party;

The alleged cause of the detention of the property according to the best knowledge, information and belief of the affiant;

The property has not been taken for a tax, assessment or fine pursuant to a statute, or seized under an execution or an attachment against the property of the plaintiff, or if so seized, that it is by statute exempt from seizure; and

The actual value of the property.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 107; Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 673; R.S. 1887, §§ 3021, 3523; Laws 1890-91, ch. 91, § 2; ch. 96, § 1; R.S. 1899, §§ 4146, 4435; C.S. 1910, §§ 5006, 5298; C.S. 1920, §§ 6276, 6570; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1802, 89-4002; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-7402, 14-1202; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-694, 1-1001; Laws 1973, ch. 214, § 2; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

1-21-1102

, 1-34-102; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 1-15-303.
Issuance of writ; undertaking; service.

If authorized by a written order of the court pursuant to W.S. 1-15-103(a)(i), and upon the filing by plaintiff of the bond required by W.S.

1-15-104

, the clerk shall issue the writ of replevin.

The writ shall be issued in the name of the state of Wyoming and shall require the sheriff to take the property described in the affidavit and retain it in his custody until delivered as provided in this article. The sheriff shall execute the writ and without delay serve on the defendant a copy of the affidavit, undertaking and writ. If personal service cannot be made upon the defendant service shall be made by depositing a copy of the papers in the United States mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the defendant at his last known address.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, §§ 108, 109; Laws 1886, ch. 60, §§ 674, 676; R.S. 1887, §§ 3022, 3024, 3524, 3525; Laws 1890-91, ch. 91, §§ 3, 4; R.S. 1899, §§ 4147, 4149, 4436, 4437; C.S. 1910, §§ 5007, 5009, 5299, 5300; C.S. 1920, §§ 6277, 6279, 6571, 6572; R.S. 1931, §§ 62-1803, 62-1804, 89-4003, 89-4005; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-7403, 3-7404, 14-1203, 14-1204; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-695, 1-696, 1-1002, 1-1004; Laws 1973, ch. 173, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 1-21-1104, 1-21-1105, 1-34-104, 1-34-106; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

§ 1-15-304.
Delivery of property.

Subject to the provisions
of W.S. 1-15-103(a)(viii) and

1-15-306

, property seized under a writ of replevin shall be delivered
by the sheriff to the plaintiff unless returned to the defendant pursuant
to W.S. 1-15-104(c) or

1-15-105

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

Law reviews. —

See case note, “Constitutional Law — Due Process — Replevin —
Right to Notice and Hearing Prior to Deprivation of Property. Fuentes v. Shevin, 407 U.S. 67, 32 L. Ed. 2d 556, 92 S. Ct. 1983, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 42 (1972),” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 315 (1973).

§ 1-15-305.
Return of sheriff.

The sheriff shall return
the writ to the court within twenty (20) days after its receipt, together
with a certificate of his actions endorsed thereon or attached thereto.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 675; R.S. 1887, § 3023; R.S. 1899, § 4148; C.S. 1910, § 5008; C.S. 1920, § 6278; R.S. 1931, § 89-4004; C.S. 1945, § 3-7404; W.S. 1957, § 1-1003; Laws 1973, ch. 214, § 2; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-34-105; Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.

§ 1-15-306.
Claim to property by third party.

If property taken under
a writ of replevin is claimed by any person other than the defendant,
and the claimant serves on the sheriff an affidavit stating the grounds
of the claimant’s title or right to possession, the sheriff is not
bound to keep the property or deliver it to the plaintiff, unless
the plaintiff files with the sheriff a surety bond, indemnifying the
sheriff against any loss or damage by reason of the illegality of
any holding or delivery or by reason of damage to any personal property
held under the writ of replevin. Unless a lesser amount is acceptable
to the sheriff, the bond shall be in double the amount of the estimated
value of the property seized.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 3.